Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1160.
do enact as follows:AB1160,11Section 1. 71.63 (3) (d) of the statutes is repealed.AB1160,22Section 2. 71.65 (6) of the statutes is repealed.AB1160,33Section 3. 71.83 (1) (a) 1n. of the statutes is created to read:AB1160,3,2471.83 (1) (a) 1n. ‘Negligent misclassification of an employee.’ If an employer 5misclassifies an individual who is an employee of the employer as a nonemployee, 6the employer may be subject to a penalty equal to $500 for each such violation. The 7department shall waive the penalty except upon a showing by the department 8under s. 73.16 (4). If the department finds that an employer has had 3 or more 9cases of negligent misclassification of employees as nonemployees in a 5-year 10period, the 3rd negligent misclassification and any subsequent findings of negligent 11misclassification shall be treated as intentional misclassifications under par. (b) 123m. unless the employer proves to the department by a preponderance of the 1evidence that the employer did not intentionally misclassify employees as 2nonemployees.AB1160,43Section 4. 71.83 (1) (b) 3m. of the statutes is created to read:AB1160,3,14471.83 (1) (b) 3m. ‘Intentional misclassification of an employee; providing false 5information.’ If an employer intentionally provides false information to the 6department or with the intent to evade any requirement of this chapter 7misclassifies or attempts to misclassify an individual who is an employee of the 8employer as a nonemployee, the employer may be subject to a penalty equal to 9$25,000 for each such violation. Notwithstanding s. 71.78 (1), the department may 10disclose on the department’s website a list of persons who, after all appeal rights 11have expired, have been subject to a penalty under this subdivision during any 7-12year period, except that the information provided on the website shall be limited to 13the name and address of each person and the date that each penalty was imposed 14on the person during that period.AB1160,3,1515